Utah statutes.
26-4-16.   Release of body for funeral preparations.
(1) (a)  Where a body is held for investigation or autopsy under this chapter
or for a medical investigation permitted by law, the body shall, if requested
by the person given priority under Section 58-9-602, be released for funeral
preparations no later than 24 hours after the arrival at the office of the
medical examiner or regional medical facility.
(b)  An extension may be ordered only by a district court.
(2)  The right and duty to control the disposition of a deceased person is
governed by Sections 58-9-601 through 58-9-606.
